Idaho statutes. Title 58 PUBLIC LANDS
Chapter 3 APPRAISEMENT, LEASE, AND SALE OF LANDS
§ 58-335. Lands exempt from act.

This act shall not be construed as applying to any lands or properties acquired under the act of congress, known as the Idaho Admission Act, or in the subsequent operations of the various endowment funds of the state. Nor shall this act apply to any lands or properties in the custody of the state board of education and the board of regents of the University of Idaho in their corporate capacity; provided however, that the state board of education and the board of regents, desiring to avail themselves of the facilities of this act, for the sale, exchange or transfer of any such properties, may proceed to negotiate a sale, transfer or exchange with the state board of land commissioners as would any other tax-supported agency. If the state board of education and the board of regents of the University of Idaho does not avail itself of the facilities of this act, then the state board of education and the board of regents shall use a process for disposal of real property that includes, at a minimum, a required appraisal and public notice of the proposed real property disposal prior to disposal; and for property disposals that are not part of an exchange or transfer, consideration given to granting a first option to purchase to local, state and federal governmental entities.

§ 58-335A. Other lands exempt from act.

The provisions of sections 58-331 through 58-335, Idaho Code, shall not apply to surplus real properties of the Idaho transportation department, with the exclusion of office and maintenance yard sites. The Idaho transportation board shall promulgate rules to govern the sale of surplus real properties under this section, provided that in no case shall a property be sold or exchanged for a value less than that established through the appraisal process; and provided further that surplus real property may be offered for sale or exchange to any tax-supported agency or political subdivision of the state of Idaho, other than the state of Idaho or its agencies, in whose jurisdiction the property is located, at a negotiated price not to exceed the appraised value. Such surplus property sold or exchanged for less than the appraised value must be used in perpetuity exclusively for a public purpose which shall be stated in the deed of transfer. If the stated use shall cease, the property shall revert to the ownership of the Idaho transportation department.

For the purpose of acquiring highway rights-of-way, the Idaho transportation board is authorized to exchange surplus real property of the department for other parcels of real property. In exchanging real properties, the board shall cause both parcels of real property to be appraised, and either the owner or the department shall pay to the other the difference in value.

Before the department disposes of surplus property at public sale, the department shall first notify any person who owns real property which is contiguous with the surplus property of the department that he has first option to purchase the surplus property for an amount not less than the appraised value. If more than one (1) adjoining owner wants to purchase the property, a private auction shall be held for such parties. If no owner of adjoining property exercises his option to buy, the department may proceed to public sale.

§ 58-335B. Governor’s housing committee lands exempt from act.

Sections 58-331 through 58-335, Idaho Code, shall not apply to real property if acquired by or on behalf of the governor’s housing committee pursuant to [section] 67-455 or 67-455A, Idaho Code, as the same now exists or may from time to time be amended. This section shall apply to all real property acquired pursuant to section 67-455 or 67-455A, Idaho Code, before or after the effective date of this section.

§ 58-336. State lands — Assessment for local benefits.

All lands, including school lands, granted lands, escheated lands, or other lands owned by the state of Idaho in fee simple, situated within the limits of any incorporated city, town or local improvement district in this state, may be assessed and charged for the cost of local benefits specially benefiting such lands which may be ordered by the proper authorities of any such city, town or local improvement district:

Provided, that the leasehold, contractual or possessory interest of any person, firm, association, private or municipal corporation in any such lands shall be charged and assessed in the proportional amount such leasehold contractual or possessory interest is benefited;

Provided further, that the interest of the state in such property shall not be sold to satisfy the lien of such assessment, but only such interest or contract or other right therein as may be in private ownership shall be subject to such sale.

Provided further, that nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the payment by the state of Idaho or any agency thereof of any tax levied by any local unit of government.

§ 58-337. Lease of old penitentiary site.

To preserve and enhance the cultural, educational, recreational and scenic values of the old penitentiary site at Boise, the state board of land commissioners or any other state agency having jurisdiction and control over the site is authorized to lease any part of the site to private persons, firms, or corporations for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years. The board is also authorized to relinquish control and custody over any part of the old penitentiary site to other state agencies for use as building or office space. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, proceeds from the rental of the old penitentiary site beyond cost of maintenance and historic interpretation shall be credited to the permanent building fund. For purposes of this act, the old penitentiary site at Boise includes all penitentiary reserve and acquired lands owned by the state of Idaho in:

Sections 12 and 13, Township 3 North, Range 2 East, Boise Meridian, and the west half of Section 18, Township 3 North, Range 3 East, Boise Meridian.